Nevada, session 83, AB378.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 453 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 3 to 7, inclusive, of this act have the meanings ascribed
to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Alternative therapy” means any treatment of a
patient for a mental health condition that involves administering
to the patient, under medical supervision and control, a
psychedelic substance.
Sec. 4. “Division” means the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health of the Department.
Sec. 5. “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
Sec. 6. “Program” means the Alternative Therapy Pilot
Program created by section 9 of this act.
Sec. 7. “Psychedelic substance” means any of the following
substances:
1. Psilocybin.
2. Psilocin.
3. Dimethyltryptamine.
4. Ibogaine.
5. Mescaline.
Sec. 8. The Legislature hereby finds and declares that:
1. Mental health conditions, including, without limitation,
post-traumatic stress disorder, depression and anxiety disorders
require innovative approaches to treatment.
2. It is the policy of this State to encourage and promote
programs which provide for the treatment and rehabilitation of
-
*AB378_R1*

– 4 –
persons with a mental health condition through alternative
treatments that may include, without limitation, the administration
of controlled substances in a clinical setting.
3. Providing access to treatments that involve the
administration of psychedelic substances, under proper medical
supervision, may contribute to the public welfare by fostering
enhanced treatment outcomes.
Sec. 9. 1. The Alternative Therapy Pilot Program is hereby
created for the purpose of providing certain patients who have
been diagnosed with a mental health condition access to treatment
involving the administration, under medical supervision and
control, of psychedelic substances through the development and
implementation of experimental and investigational pilot clinic
programs. The Division shall administer the Program.
2. As part of the Program, the Division shall, within the limits
of available funds, including, without limitation, legislative
appropriations, develop and implement experimental and
investigational pilot clinic programs for the provision of
alternative therapies. All alternative therapies provided under such
a pilot clinic program must be provided:
(a) By or under the supervision of a practitioner who has been
approved by the Division;
(b) At a medical facility or other location that has been
approved by the Division;
(c) To a patient who has been approved by the Division and
who meets all of the following criteria:
(1) The patient has been diagnosed with a mental health
condition;
(2) The patient is 21 years of age or older; and
(3) The patient has either:
(I) Received an honorable discharge or general
discharge under honorable conditions from the Armed Forces of
the United States; or
(II) Previously been employed as a first responder, as
defined in NRS 193.1678.
(d) In compliance with all applicable medical and ethical
standards; and
(e) In conjunction with any supporting or rehabilitative
services necessary to enhance the efficacy of treatment with
psychedelic substances.
3. In administering the Program, the Division shall:
(a) Ensure that all alternative therapies provided under a pilot
clinic program pursuant to subsection 2 are provided in
accordance with the requirements set forth in that subsection.
-
*AB378_R1*

– 5 –
(b) Approve qualified practitioners, patients and medical
facilities or other locations to participate in a pilot clinic program
pursuant to subsection 2.
(c) Ensure that comprehensive data concerning all aspects of
alternative therapies provided under a pilot clinic program
pursuant to subsection 2 is collected and reported to the Division.
Such data must include, data concerning longitudinal outcomes
for participants in such a program.
(d) Provide for the participation in the Program of institutions
of higher education in this State, which may include, without
limitation, the training of practitioners, research on alternative
therapies and the evaluation of therapeutic protocols.
Sec. 10. 1. The Division shall adopt regulations to carry
out the provisions of sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this act. The
regulations must include, without limitation:
(a) Procedures and criteria for determining whether to
approve a practitioner, patient, medical facility or other location to
participate in a pilot clinic program developed and implemented
under the Program;
(b) Procedures to ensure that each patient who participates in
a pilot clinic program developed and implemented under the
Program receives a plan for the continuation of care upon the
completion of his or her participation in the Program which has
been approved by the Division;
(c) Protocols to ensure that psychedelic substances are
handled, stored and administered safely, ethically and in a manner
consistent with federal and state law;
(d) Standards for the reporting of the outcomes and
effectiveness of any alternative therapies provided through a pilot
clinic program developed and implemented under the Program;
(e) Any provisions the Division determines to be necessary to
ensure that pilot clinic programs developed and implemented
under the Program receive appropriate medical supervision; and
(f) Any provisions the Division determines to be necessary to
protect the public health and safety.
2. The regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must be
designed to:
(a) Ensure that the provision of any alternative therapy under
a pilot clinic program developed and implemented under the
Program conforms to the highest standards of patient safety,
medical ethics and informed consent; and
(b) Promote the health and welfare of persons with a mental
health condition, consistent with the declared policy of this State.
Sec. 11. In developing and implementing pilot clinic
programs under the Program, the Division may carry out or
-
*AB378_R1*

– 6 –
contract for any programs of research and education that the
Division deems necessary to:
1. Develop new approaches for the treatment of mental health
conditions through the administration of psychedelic substances;
2. Improve the quality or availability of prevention and
treatment services; and
3. Train practitioners and other personnel who require
specialized instruction to safely provide alternative therapies
under a pilot clinic program.
Sec. 12. 1. The Division shall authorize at least one person
to cultivate, manufacture or otherwise produce psychedelic
substances for use in any pilot clinic program developed and
implemented under the Program.
2. A person authorized to cultivate, manufacture or otherwise
produce psychedelic substances pursuant to subsection 1 shall:
(a) Comply with all standards and requirements, including,
without limitation, security requirements and reporting
requirements, established by the Division;
(b) Obtain and maintain any registration required by this
chapter and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto to engage in
the production, distribution or use of controlled substances for the
purpose of conducting research; and
(c) Not cultivate, manufacture or otherwise produce or
distribute any psychedelic substance except as authorized by the
Division in connection with the Program.
Sec. 12.5. The Division may require a person who wishes to
participate in the Program by operating a pilot clinic program or
by cultivating, manufacturing or otherwise producing psychedelic
substances for use in a pilot clinic program under the Program to
reimburse the Division for the actual costs and expenses incurred
by the Division in conducting any inspections or providing any
certifications that the Division deems necessary to allow for such
participation.
Sec. 13. 1. The Division shall collect comprehensive data
concerning all alternative therapies provided under any pilot clinic
program developed and implemented under the Program. Such
data must include, without limitation, the following data
concerning each patient who participates in such a pilot clinic
program:
(a) Demographic information.
(b) A baseline mental health assessment.
(c) Outcome measures, including, without limitation,
longitudinal data after treatments have concluded.
(d) Any data relating to monitoring performed for ethical or
safety purposes.
-
*AB378_R1*

– 7 –
2. Any data collected pursuant to subsection 1 that would
lead to the identification of any patient participating in a pilot
clinic program developed and implemented under the Program is
confidential and must be securely maintained by each person who
has possession, custody or control of the data.
3. On or before January 1 of each year the Division shall
submit to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to the Legislature a report on the status and results of
the Program. The report must not contain any information that
would lead to the identification of any patient participating in a
pilot clinic program developed and implemented under the
Program.
Sec. 13.5. 1. The Division shall establish an advisory
committee consisting of medical professionals, representatives of
relevant state agencies and other stakeholders. The Division shall
appoint such number of members of the committee as the Division
determines is appropriate to carry out the duties of the committee.
2. The advisory committee established pursuant to subsection
1 shall:
(a) Assist the Division with oversight of the development,
implementation, evaluation and financial viability of pilot clinic
programs under the Program.
(b) Submit to the Department a quarterly report concerning
the operations of the pilot clinic programs developed and
implemented under the Program.
Sec. 14. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
person who has been approved by the Division to participate in a
pilot clinic program developed and implemented under the
Program, to produce psychedelic substances for use in such pilot
clinic programs or to otherwise participate in the Program and
who engages in any conduct relating to psychedelic substances
within the scope of his or her participation in the Program and in
compliance with the provisions of sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of
this act and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto is immune
from civil, criminal and administrative liability arising from that
conduct and any such conduct may not constitute the basis for any
investigation, detention, search, seizure, arrest, prosecution or
other legal penalty against the person.
Sec. 14.5. 1. Nothing in the provisions of sections 2 to 16,
inclusive, of this act shall be construed to imply the creation of
any warranty or guarantee by the Department, its officers or
employees as to the success, safety or any particular outcome of
any alternative therapy provided through a pilot clinic program
developed and implemented under the Program.
-
*AB378_R1*

– 8 –
2. No cause of action may be brought against the
Department, its officers or employees on the basis of an alleged
breach of any warranty or guarantee described in subsection 1.
3. The Department shall post a notice on the Internet website
of the Department indicating that the Department, its officers and
employees do not offer any warranty or guarantee as to the
success, safety or any particular outcome of any alternative
therapy provided under the Program.
Sec. 15. 1. The Division may coordinate with other state
agencies, including, without limitation, the Board and other
health care licensing boards, as defined in NRS 629.079, to
facilitate the oversight of pilot clinic programs developed and
implemented under the Program.
2. To the extent consistent with federal law, the Division shall
take all actions which are feasible to ensure that all pilot clinic
programs developed and implemented under the Program comply
with all applicable federal requirements or guidelines relating to
the clinical or experimental use of controlled substances.
Sec. 16. 1. The Division may accept gifts, grants, donations
or other sources of money to carry out the provisions of sections 2
to 16, inclusive, of this act, including, without limitation, to
support or expand pilot clinic programs developed and
implemented under the Program.
2. The Division may enter into contracts and other lawful
agreements with private or public entities to assist the Division in
carrying out the provisions of sections 2 to 16, inclusive, of this
act, including, without limitation, contracts or agreements for the
purpose of developing, implementing or evaluating pilot clinic
programs under the Program or for the production or distribution
of psychedelic substances for use in such pilot clinic programs.
Sec. 17. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
-
*AB378_R1*

– 9 –
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
-
*AB378_R1*

– 10 –
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 13 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of
chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391,
Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
-
*AB378_R1*

– 11 –
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 18. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 19. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 18, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purposes of adopting
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks; and
-
*AB378_R1*

– 12 –
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB378_R1*